Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 9. Employer’s Liability and Workers’ Compensation
§ 620.
Worker hired outside State.

If a worker who has been hired outside this State is injured while engaged in his or her employer’s business and is entitled to compensation for such injury under the law of the state where he or she was hired, he or she shall be entitled to enforce against his or her employer his or her rights in this State, if his or her rights are such that they can be reasonably determined and dealt with by the Commissioner and the court in this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Particular Cases.

When a worker was neither employed nor hired in Vermont, the statute applying to workers hired outside of Vermont did not entitle him to transfer his New York workers’ compensation case to Vermont and begin claiming Vermont benefits. That does not mean, however, that the Commissioner of Labor lacked jurisdiction to take his case; rather, the Commissioner and the trial court should have questioned whether his rights under New York law could be reasonably determined and dealt with in Vermont. Letourneau v. A.N. Deringer/Wausau Ins. Co., 2008 VT 106, 184 Vt. 422, 966 A.2d 133, 2008 Vt. LEXIS 105 (2008).

Creation of a right “to enforce rights in this State” in the statute applying to workers hired outside of Vermont does not entitle workers not employed or hired in Vermont to Vermont workers’ compensation benefits, but rather gives those workers the right to utilize Vermont’s administrative and court systems to enforce their entitlement to benefits under other schemes—namely, the schemes of the states where they were hired. The question of whether workers’ compensation benefits can reasonably be determined and dealt with in Vermont is a practical one that asks to what extent the Department of Labor and Vermont’s courts can apply the laws of other states and administer benefits through their schemes. Letourneau v. A.N. Deringer/Wausau Ins. Co., 2008 VT 106, 184 Vt. 422, 966 A.2d 133, 2008 Vt. LEXIS 105 (2008).

Cited.

Cited in

DeGray v. Miller Brothers Construction Co., 106 Vt. 259, 173 A. 556, 1934 Vt. LEXIS 169 (1934).

§ 621.
Interstate commerce.

The provisions of this chapter shall affect the liability of employers to employees engaged in interstate or foreign commerce or otherwise only so far as the same is permissible under the laws of the United States.

§ 622.
Right to compensation exclusive.

Except as provided in subsection 618(b) and section 624 of this title, the rights and remedies granted by the provisions of this chapter to an employee on account of a personal injury for which he or she is entitled to compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall exclude all other rights and remedies of the employee, the employee’s personal representatives, dependents, or next of kin, at common law or otherwise on account of such injury.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 19

, § 2.

§ 623.
Contracts to work outside State.

Employers who hire workers within this State to work outside the State may agree with such workers that the remedies under the provisions of this chapter shall be exclusive as regards injuries received outside this State by accident arising out of and in the course of such employment.
All contracts of hiring in this State shall be presumed to include such an agreement.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 624.
Dual liability; claims, settlement procedure.

Where the injury for which compensation is payable under the provisions of this chapter was caused under circumstances creating a legal liability to pay the resulting damages in some person other than the employer, the acceptance of compensation benefits or the commencement of proceedings to enforce compensation payments shall not act as an election of remedies, but the injured employee or the employee’s personal representative may also proceed to enforce the liability of such third party for damages in accordance with the provisions of this section. If the injured employee or the employee’s personal representative does not commence the action within one year after the occurrence of the personal injury, then the employer or its insurance carrier may, within the period of time for the commencement of actions prescribed by statute, enforce the liability of the third party in the name of the injured employee or the employee’s personal representative. Not less than 30 days before the commencement of suit by any party under this section, the party shall notify, by registered mail at their last known address, the Commissioner, the injured employee, or in the event of death, the employee’s known dependents, or personal representative or known next of kin, the employee’s employer, and the workers’ compensation insurance carrier. Any party in interest shall have a right to join in the suit but the direction and control of the suit shall be with the injured employee.

Prior to entry of judgment, either the employer or the employer’s insurance carrier or the employee or the employee’s personal representative may settle their claims as their interest shall appear and may execute releases therefor, but the consent of the employer, or, if insured, the insurance carrier, shall be required, if the amount of the settlement by the employee or the employee’s personal representative is less than the compensation benefits that would have been payable in the future but for the provisions of this section.

The settlement and release by the employee shall not be a bar to action by the employer or its insurance carrier to proceed against the third party for any interest or claim it might have.

In the event the injured employee or personal representative settle the claim for injury or death, or commence proceedings thereon against the third party before the payment of workers’ compensation, the recovery or commencement of proceedings shall not act as an election of remedies and any monies so recovered shall be applied as provided in this section.

In an action to enforce the liability of a third party, the injured employee may recover any amount that the employee or the employee’s personal representative would be entitled to recover in a civil action. Any recovery against the third party for damages resulting from personal injuries or death only, after deducting expenses of recovery, shall first reimburse the employer or its workers’ compensation insurance carrier for any amounts paid or payable under this chapter to date of recovery, and the balance shall forthwith be paid to the employee or the employee’s dependents or personal representative and shall be treated as an advance payment by the employer on account of any future payment of compensation benefits. Reimbursement required under this subsection, except to prevent double recovery, shall not reduce the employee’s recovery of any benefit or payment provided by a plan or policy that was privately purchased by the injured employee, including uninsured-underinsured motorist coverage, or any other first party insurance payments or benefits.
(e) (1) In an action to enforce the liability of a third party, the injured employee may recover any amount that the employee or the employee’s personal representative would be entitled to recover in a civil action. Any recovery against the third party for damages resulting from personal injuries or death only, after deducting expenses of recovery, shall first reimburse the employer or its workers’ compensation insurance carrier for any amounts paid or payable under this chapter to date of recovery, and the balance shall forthwith be paid to the employee or the employee’s dependents or personal representative and shall be treated as an advance payment by the employer on account of any future payment of compensation benefits. Reimbursement required under this subsection, except to prevent double recovery, shall not reduce the employee’s recovery of any benefit or payment provided by a plan or policy that was privately purchased by the injured employee, including uninsured-underinsured motorist coverage, or any other first party insurance payments or benefits.

Should the recovery against the third party for damages resulting from personal injuries or death only, after deducting expenses of recovery, be less than the full value of the claim for personal injuries or death, the reimbursement to the employer or workers’ compensation insurance carrier shall be limited to that portion of the recovery allocated for damages covered by the Workers’ Compensation Act. If a court has not allocated or the parties cannot agree to the allocation of the recovered damages, either party may request that the Commissioner make an administrative determination. Upon receiving a request, the Commissioner shall order mediation with a mediator selected from a list approved by the Commissioner. If mediation is unsuccessful, the Commissioner may adjudicate the dispute or refer the dispute to an arbitrator approved by the Commissioner. The determination of the Commissioner or of an arbitrator approved by the Commissioner shall be final. The cost of any mediation or arbitration shall be split equally by the parties.

Expenses of recovery shall be the reasonable expenditures, including attorney’s fees, incurred in effecting the recovery. Attorney’s fees, unless otherwise agreed upon, shall be divided among the attorneys for the plaintiff as directed by the court. The expenses of recovery shall be apportioned by the court between the parties as their interests appear at the time of the recovery.

Compensation benefits referred to in this section shall in each instance include but not be limited to all expenses incurred under sections 639 and 640 of this title.

The injured employee or the employee’s personal representative shall be prohibited from commencing a civil action to enforce liability against the workers’ compensation insurance carrier for conducting workplace inspections, or an employer-employee safety committee except in the case of gross negligence or willful misconduct. The employee or the employee’s personal representative shall have the burden of proving gross negligence or willful misconduct.

The Commissioner, by rule, may require workers’ compensation carriers to conduct periodic workplace inspections and to provide other safety related advice to their insureds.

The Commissioner shall determine, by rule, workplaces where an insured has demonstrated an unusually poor safety record, as defined by the Commissioner.

Employers with unusually poor safety records, as defined by the Commissioner, shall create workplace safety committees with balanced representation between management and employees and, with the assistance of the Department, shall design and implement written accident prevention plans that shall be distributed to all employees. The Department shall issue bulletins of best safety practices.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 232

;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 3, 1978;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 41

, § 4;

2003, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 26, 2004;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 65, eff. June 24, 2014;

2017, No. 74

, § 39;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 148.

§ 625.
Contracting out forbidden.

An employer shall not be relieved in whole or in part from liability created by the provisions of this chapter by any contract, rule, regulation, or device whatsoever.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 134

, § 1, eff. June 6, 1963.

§§ 626-628.
Repealed.
1981, No. 165 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 629.
Repealed.
1989, No. 104, § 2, eff. Feb. 1, 1990.

§§ 630,
631.
Repealed.
1981, No. 165 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 632.
Compensation to dependents; burial and funeral expenses.

If death results from the injury, the employer shall pay to the persons entitled to compensation or, if there are none, then to the personal representative of the deceased employee, the actual burial and funeral expenses not to exceed $10,000.00 and the actual expenses for out-of-state transportation of the decedent to the place of burial not to exceed $5,000.00. Every two years, the Commissioner of Labor shall evaluate the average burial and funeral expenses in the State and make a recommendation to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development as to whether an adjustment in compensation is warranted. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this section. The employer shall also pay to or for the benefit of the following persons, for the periods prescribed in section 635 of this title, a weekly compensation equal to the following percentages of the deceased employee’s average weekly wages. The weekly compensation payment herein allowed shall not exceed the maximum weekly compensation or be lower than the minimum weekly compensation:

To the spouse, if there are no dependent children, 662/3 percent.

To the spouse, if there is one dependent child, 712/3 percent; or if there are two or more dependent children, 762/3 percent. The compensation to the spouse shall be for the use and benefit of the spouse and of the dependent children.

If there is no spouse, but a dependent child or children, then to the child or children, the amount or amounts payable to a spouse with the same number of dependent children, to be divided equally among the children if more than one.

If there is neither spouse, nor child, but there is a dependent father or mother, then to the parent, if wholly dependent, 30 percent, or if partially dependent, 20 percent or if both parents are dependent, then one-half of the foregoing compensation to each of them. If there is no such parent, but a dependent grandparent, then to every such grandparent the same compensation as to a parent.

If there is neither dependent spouse, child, parent, nor grandparent, but there is a dependent grandchild, brother, or sister, or two or more of them, to the dependents 15 percent for one dependent and five percent additional for each additional dependent, with a maximum of 25 percent to be divided equally between the dependents if more than one.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 191

, § 1;

1961, No. 22

;

1963, No. 191

, § 1;

1965, No. 67

, § 1;

1965, No. 87

, § 1;

1967, No. 122

, § 2;

1975, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 3, 1978;

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1995, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 50;

2017, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 633.
Apportionment of compensation.

The Commissioner shall, from time to time, apportion such compensation between any and all dependents named in section 632 of this title in such manner as he or she deems best and in making such apportionment he or she shall, insofar as it is possible, apportion such sum so that each dependent shall be self-supporting.

§ 634.
Dependents; construction.

The following persons, and they only, shall be deemed dependents and entitled to compensation under the provisions of sections 632 and 633 of this title:

A child, if under 18 years of age, or incapable of self-support and unmarried, whether or not ever actually dependent upon the deceased; or a child while regularly enrolled in an approved educational or vocational training institution, who was at the time of the employee’s injury or death partially or wholly dependent on the employee, regardless of age; or a child of any age who was mentally or physically disabled at the time of the employee’s death and partially or wholly dependent upon him or her.

A spouse.

A parent or grandparent only if dependent, wholly or partially, upon the deceased.

A grandchild, brother, or sister under 18 years of age, or incapable of self-support, and wholly dependent upon the deceased employee, or who is regularly enrolled in an approved educational or vocational training institution, and was at the time of the employee’s death, partially or wholly dependent upon the employee, regardless of age; or a grandchild, brother, or sister of any age who was mentally or physically disabled at the time of the employee’s death and partially or wholly dependent upon him or her. The relation of dependency must exist at the time of the injury.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 122

, § 3;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 3, 1978;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 635.
Periods of compensation.

The compensation provided for by the provisions of this chapter shall be payable during the following periods:

Spouse. To a spouse until:
(1) (A) Spouse. To a spouse until:

sixty-two years of age if at that time the spouse is entitled to benefits under the Social Security Act as amended or thereafter at such time as the spouse is entitled to benefits under the Social Security Act as amended; or

remarriage; or

death, whichever occurs first.

However, in no event shall the spouse receive less than a sum equal to 330 times the maximum weekly compensation except when the compensation terminates by reason of death.

Child. To or for a child, during dependency as defined in section 634 of this title.

Parent or Grandparent. To a parent or grandparent, during the continuation of a condition of actual dependency, but in no case to exceed 264 weeks.

Grandchild or sibling. To or for a grandchild, brother, or sister, during dependency as defined in section 634 of this title, but in no case to exceed 264 weeks.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 122

, § 4;

1969, No. 120

, eff. April 22, 1969;

1971, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 3, 1978;

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 74

, § 40.

§ 636.
Compensation for unexpired period; determined.

Upon the cessation of compensation under section 635 of this title to or on account of any person, the compensation of the remaining persons entitled to compensation for the unexpired part of the period during which their compensation is payable shall be that which such persons would have received if they had been the only persons entitled to compensation at the time of the decedent’s death.

§ 637.
Death benefits; rival claimants.

Payment of death benefits by an employer in good faith to a dependent subsequent in right to another or other dependents shall protect and discharge the employer unless and until such dependent or dependents prior in right have given him notice of his, her, or their claim.
In case the employer is in doubt as to the respective rights of rival claimants, he or she may apply to the Commissioner to decide between them.

§ 638.
Repealed.
1977, No. 182 (Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 3, 1978.

§ 639.
Death, payment to dependents.

In cases of the death of a person from any cause other than the accident during the period of payments for disability or for the permanent injury, the remaining payments for disability then due or for the permanent injury shall be made to the person’s dependents according to the provisions of sections 635 and 636 of this title, or if there are none, the remaining amount due, but not more than the actual burial and funeral expenses not to exceed $10,000.00 and the actual expenses for out-of-state transportation of the decedent to the place of burial not to exceed $5,000.00, shall be paid in a lump sum to the proper person. Every two years, the Commissioner of Labor shall evaluate the average burial and funeral expenses in the State and make a recommendation to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development as to whether an adjustment in compensation is warranted. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 66

;

1963, No. 191

, § 2;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 3, 1978;

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1995, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

2017, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 640.
Medical benefits; assistive devices; home and automobile modifications.

An employer subject to the provisions of this chapter shall furnish to an injured employee reasonable surgical, medical, and nursing services and supplies, including prescription drugs and durable medical equipment. The employer shall provide assistive devices and modification to vehicles and residences reasonably necessary to permit an injured worker who is determined to have or expected to suffer a permanent disability, such as an ambulatory disability as defined in

20 V.S.A. § 2900

or blindness as defined in

20 V.S.A. § 2900

, that substantially and permanently prevents or limits the worker’s ability to continue to live at home or perform basic life functions. In determining what devices and modifications are reasonably necessary, consideration shall be given to factors that include ownership of the residence to be modified, the length of time the worker is expected to utilize and benefit from the devices or modifications, and the extent to which the devices or modifications enhance or improve the worker’s independent functioning. The employer shall also furnish reasonable hospital services and supplies, including surgical, medical, and nursing services while the injured employee is confined in a hospital for treatment and care.

An employer may designate the treating health care provider to initially treat an injured employee immediately following a compensable injury. Thereafter, the employee may select another health care provider upon giving the employer written notice of the employee’s reasons for dissatisfaction with the health care provider designated by the employer and the name and address of the health care provider selected by the employee. The Commissioner may permit an employer to refuse to reimburse a health care provider selected by the employee if notice required in this subsection is not provided to the employer unless the failure to provide notice is due to excusable neglect or inadvertence.

An employer shall not withhold any wages from an employee for the employee’s absence from work for treatment of a work injury or to attend a medical examination related to a work injury. If the employee selects a new health care provider in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the employer shall have the right to require other medical examinations as provided in this chapter.

The liability of the employer to pay for medical, surgical, hospital, and nursing services and supplies, prescription drugs, and durable medical equipment provided to the injured employee under this section shall not exceed the maximum fee for a particular service, prescription drug, or durable medical equipment as provided by a schedule of fees and rates prepared by the Commissioner. The reimbursement rate for services and supplies in the fee schedule shall include consideration of medical necessity, clinical efficacy, cost-effectiveness, and safety, and those services and supplies shall be provided on a nondiscriminatory basis consistent with workers’ compensation and health care law. The Commissioner shall authorize reimbursement at a rate higher than the scheduled rate if the employee demonstrates to the Commissioner’s satisfaction that reasonable and necessary treatment, prescription drugs, or durable medical equipment is not available at the scheduled rate. An employer shall establish direct billing and payment procedures and notification procedures as necessary for coverage of medically-necessary prescription medications for chronic conditions of injured employees, in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner.

In the case of a work-related, first-aid-only injury, the employer shall file the first report of injury with the Department of Labor. The employer shall file the first report of injury with the workers’ compensation insurance carrier or pay the medical bill within 30 days. If the employer contests a claim, a first report of injury shall be forwarded to the Department of Labor and the insurer within five days of notice. If additional treatment or medical visits are required or if the employee loses more than one day of work, the claim shall be promptly reported to the workers’ compensation insurer, which shall adjust the claim. “Work-related, first-aid-only-treatment” means any one-time treatment that generates a bill for less than $750.00 and for which the employee loses no time from work except for the time for medical treatment and recovery not to exceed one day of absence from work.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 36

, eff. March 12, 1959;

1961, No. 148

, § 1;

1967, No. 122

, § 5;

1989, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.);

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1999, No. 41

, § 1;

2003, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 26, 2004;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2017, No. 74

, § 41.

§ 640a.
Medical bills; payment; dispute.

No later than 30 days following receipt of a bill from a health care provider for medical, surgical, hospital, nursing services, supplies, prescription drugs, or durable medical equipment provided to an injured employee, an employer or insurance carrier shall do one of the following:

Pay or reimburse the bill.

Provide written notification to the injured employee, the health care provider, and the Commissioner that the medical bill is contested or denied. The notice shall include specific reasons supporting the contest or denial, a description of any additional information needed by the employer or insurance carrier to determine liability for the medical bill, and a request that such information be submitted to the employer or insurance carrier within 30 days following receipt of the notice.

Disputes regarding payment of a medical bill may be filed with the Commissioner by the injured employee or the health care provider. Disputes regarding payment of a medical bill or interest on that bill shall be determined by the Commissioner or, at the option of either party, be settled by arbitration in accordance with the Commercial Rules of the American Arbitration Association. The decision of an arbitrator shall be provided to the Commissioner, and the award may be entered as a judgment in a court of jurisdiction.

If a medical bill was denied on the basis that the employer or insurance carrier was not provided with sufficient information to determine liability for payment pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the employer or insurance carrier has 30 days following receipt of the additional information requested to pay or deny payment of the bill.

Medical bills shall be paid within the time required in this section or according to the time requirements specified in a contract between the health care provider and the employer or insurance carrier.

Interest shall accrue on an unpaid medical bill at the rate of 12 percent per annum calculated as follows:

From the first calendar day following 30 days after the date the medical bill is received by the employer or insurance carrier for any of the following:

A medical bill that was not denied.

A medical bill that was denied and written notice was not provided or not provided within 30 days after receipt of the medical bill.

For a medical bill that was denied based on insufficient information and notice was provided in compliance with subdivision (a)(2) of this section, from the first calendar day following 30 days after receipt of additional information sufficient to determine liability for payment.

For a medical bill that was denied and notice was provided in compliance with subsection (a) of this section, from the first calendar day following 30 days after the date of a final arbitration award, judgment, or administrative order awarding payment of the disputed medical bill.

For a medical bill that is paid in accordance with a contract between the health care provider and the employer or insurance carrier, from the day following the contract payment period or as otherwise specified in the contract.

A health care provider shall submit a medical bill accompanied by medical documentation to the employer or insurance carrier within six months after the date the health care provider had actual knowledge that the services provided were related to a claim under this chapter. For the purposes of this section, “medical documentation” means documentation that describes an injury and the treatment provided and includes all relevant treatment notes, medical records, and diagnostic codes with sufficient detail to review the medical necessity of the service and the appropriateness of the fee charged. Failure to submit the bill within six months does not bar payment unless the employer or insurance carrier is prejudiced by the delay. The Commissioner may extend the six-month limit if the Commissioner determines that the delay resulted from circumstances outside the control of the health care provider.

A medical bill shall be submitted in a legible form with every field or data element relevant to the treatment completed and treatment coding that conforms to the criteria of the National Correct Coding Initiative. The medical bill shall be submitted in any one of the following electronic or paper formats:

CMS 1500 or its electronic equivalent for medical services.

UB04 or its electronic equivalent for hospital inpatient and outpatient services.

ADA J515 or its electronic equivalent for dental services.

The Commissioner may assess penalties as provided in section 688 of this title against an employer or insurance carrier that fails to comply with the provisions of this section and may also refer to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation any employer or insurance carrier that neglects or refuses to pay medical bills as required by this section.

Any interest or penalty paid by an employer or insurance carrier under this chapter shall be excluded from the claims data reported pursuant to

8 V.S.A. § 4687

.

An employer or insurance carrier shall not impose on any health care provider any retrospective denial of a previously paid medical bill or any part of that previously paid medical bill, unless:

The employer or insurance carrier has provided at least 30 days’ notice of any retrospective denial or overpayment recovery or both in writing to the health care provider. The notice must include:

the injured employee’s name;

the service date;

the payment amount;

the proposed adjustment; and

a reasonably specific explanation of the proposed adjustment.

The time that has elapsed does not exceed 12 months from the later of the date of payment of the previously paid medical bill or the date of a final determination of compensability.

The retrospective denial of a previously paid medical bill shall be permitted beyond 12 months from the later of the date of payment or the date of a final determination of compensability for any of the following reasons:

The employer or insurance carrier has a reasonable belief that fraud or other intentional misconduct has occurred.

The medical bill payment was incorrect because the health care provider was already paid for the health services identified in the medical bill.

The health care services identified in the medical bill were not delivered by the health care provider.

The medical bill payment is the subject of adjustment with another workers’ compensation or health insurer.

The medical bill is the subject of legal action.

For purposes of subsections (j) and (k) of this section, for routine recoveries as described in subdivisions (A) through (J) of this subdivision (1), retrospective denial or overpayment recovery of any or all of a previously paid medical bill shall not require 30 days’ notice before recovery may be made. A recovery shall be considered routine only if one of the following situations applies:
(l) (1) For purposes of subsections (j) and (k) of this section, for routine recoveries as described in subdivisions (A) through (J) of this subdivision (1), retrospective denial or overpayment recovery of any or all of a previously paid medical bill shall not require 30 days’ notice before recovery may be made. A recovery shall be considered routine only if one of the following situations applies:

duplicate payment to a health care provider for the same professional service;

payment with respect to an individual for whom the employer or insurance carrier is not liable as of the date the service was provided;

payment for a noncovered service, not to include services denied as not medically necessary, experimental, or investigational in nature, or services denied through a utilization review mechanism;

erroneous payment for services due to employer or insurance carrier administrative error;

erroneous payment for services where the medical bill was processed in a manner inconsistent with the data submitted by the health care provider;

payment where the health care provider provides the employer or insurance carrier with new or additional information demonstrating an overpayment;

payment to a health care provider at an incorrect rate or using an incorrect fee schedule;

payment of medical bills for the same injured employee that are received by the employer or insurance carrier out of the chronological order in which the services were performed;

payment where the health care provider has received payment for the same services from another payer whose obligation is primary; or

payments made in coordination with a payment by a government payer that require adjustment based on an adjustment in the government-paid portion of the medical bill.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, recoveries which, in the reasonable business judgment of the employer or insurance carrier, would be likely to affect a significant volume of claims or accumulate to a significant dollar amount shall not be deemed routine, regardless of whether one or more of the situations in subdivisions (1)(A) through (J) of this subsection apply.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect the time frames established in subdivision (j)(2) or subsection (k) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 61

, § 27; amended

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 640b.
Request for preauthorization to determine if proposed treatment is necessary.

Within 14 days of receiving a request for preauthorization for a proposed medical treatment and medical evidence supporting the requested treatment, a workers’ compensation insurer shall:

authorize the treatment and notify the health care provider, the injured worker, and the Department; or

deny the treatment because the entire claim is disputed and the Commissioner has not issued an interim order to pay benefits; or
(2) (A) deny the treatment because the entire claim is disputed and the Commissioner has not issued an interim order to pay benefits; or

deny the treatment if, based on a preponderance of credible medical evidence specifically addressing the proposed treatment, it is unreasonable or unnecessary. The insurer shall notify the health care provider, the injured worker, and the Department of the decision to deny treatment; or

notify the health care provider, the injured worker, and the Department that the insurer has scheduled an examination of the employee or ordered a medical record review pursuant to section 655 of this title. Based on the examination or review, the insurer shall authorize or deny the treatment and notify the Department and the injured worker of the decision within 45 days of a request for preauthorization. The Commissioner may in his or her sole discretion grant a 10-day extension to the insurer to authorize or deny treatment, and such an extension shall not be subject to appeal.

If the insurer fails to authorize or deny the treatment pursuant to subsection (a) of this section within 14 days of receiving a request, the claimant or health care provider may request that the Department issue an order authorizing treatment. After receipt of the request, the Department shall issue an interim order within five days after notice to the insurer, and five days in which to respond, absent evidence that the entire claim is disputed. Upon request of a party, the Commissioner shall notify the parties that the treatment has been authorized by operation of law.

If the insurer denies the preauthorization of the treatment pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) or (3) of this section, the Commissioner may on his or her own initiative or upon a request by the claimant issue an order authorizing the treatment if he or she finds that the evidence shows that the treatment is reasonable, necessary, and related to the work injury.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 50

, § 3.

§ 640c.
Opioid usage deterrence.

In support of the State’s fundamental interest in ensuring the well-being of employees and employers, it is the intent of the General Assembly to protect employees from the dangers of prescription drug abuse while maintaining a balance between the employee’s health and the employee’s expedient return to work.

As it pertains to workers’ compensation claims, the Commissioner of Labor, in consultation with the Department of Health, the State Pharmacologist, the Vermont Board of Medical Practice, and the Vermont Medical Society, shall adopt rules consistent with the best practices governing the prescription of opioids, including patient screening, drug screening, and claim adjudication for patients prescribed opioids for chronic pain. In adopting rules, the Commissioner shall consider guidelines and standards such as the Occupational Medicine Practice Guidelines published by the American College of Occupational and Environmental Medicine and other medical authorities with expertise in the treatment of chronic pain. The rules shall be consistent with the standards and guidelines under

18 V.S.A. § 4289

and any rules adopted by the Department of Health pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 4289

.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 52.